Washington statutes.
RCW 15.19.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(2) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her duly authorized representative.

(3) "Facility" means, but is not limited to, the premises where ginseng is grown, stored, dried, handled, or delivered for sale or transportation, or where records required by rule under this chapter are stored or kept, and all vehicles and equipment, whether aerial or surface, used to transport ginseng.

(4) "Grower" means a person who grows cultivated, wild simulated, and/or woodsgrown American ginseng and sells it to a dealer.

(5) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, society, or association, and every officer, agent, or employee thereof.

[ 1998 c 154 s 21.]